Missouri, session 2026, SB1219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 579.040 and 579.076, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 579.040 and 579.076, to read as follows:
579.040. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
distribution, delivery, or sale of drug paraphernalia if he
or she unlawfully distributes, delivers, or sells, or
possesses with intent to distribute, deliver, or sell drug
paraphernalia knowing, or under circumstances in which one
reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant,
propogate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound,
convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack,
repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or
otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled
substance or an imitation controlled substance in violation
of this chapter. Any entity registered with the department
of health and senior services that possesses, distributes,
or delivers hypodermic needles or syringes for the purpose
of operating a syringe access program or otherwise
mitigating health risks associated with unsterile injection
drug use shall be exempt from the provisions of this

SB 1219 2
section. No such entity shall be present within five
hundred feet of any school building, unless such entity is
in operation prior to the school building commencing
operations.
2. The offense of unlawful delivery of drug
paraphernalia is a class A misdemeanor, unless done for
commercial purposes, in which case it is a class E felony.
579.076. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
manufacture of drug paraphernalia if he or she unlawfully
manufactures with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia,
knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should
know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate,
grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce,
process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store,
contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise
introduce into the human body a controlled substance or an
imitation controlled substance in violation of this chapter
or chapter 195. Any entity registered with the department
of health and senior services that delivers or manufactures
hypodermic needles or syringes for the purpose of operating
a syringe access program or otherwise mitigating health
risks associated with unsterile injection drug use shall be
exempt from the provisions of this section.
2. The offense of unlawful manufacture of drug
paraphernalia is a class A misdemeanor, unless done for
commercial purposes, in which case it is a class E felony.
✓